test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ceappat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čeäppat e-stem kaula: # Noun "kaula" - full paradigm
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: čeäppta
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: čeäpptest
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Com+Indef: čeäpptin
     čeäppat+N+Ess+Indef: čeäppten
     čeäppat+N+Par+Indef: čeäppted
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [čeäppatʼtaa, čeäppatʼtää]
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: čeäppti
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: čeäpptid
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: čeäpptid
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: čeäpptin
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Com+Indef: čeäpptivuiʹm
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [čeäpptitaa, čeäpptitää]
